sl-SI: Gradbena oprema > Vodovod: Vodovodne armature in nosilci; Strojna oprema in deli za vodovodne napeljave; Sanitarna oprema; Vodovodne cevi in napeljave; Vodovodne cevi; Kompleti za popravilo vodovodnih napeljav; Točenje in filtriranje vode; Izravnalniki vode; Časovniki za vodo; Pripomočki za vrtne vodnjake
da: Isenkram > Sanitet: Rørstykker; Dele til sanitære installationer; Sanitetsinstallationer; Rørslanger; Sanitetsrør; Rørreparationssæt; Vanddispensere og filtrering; Vandstandsmålere; Vandtimere; Tilbehør til brønde
ja: DIY用品 > 水道設備: 配管部品; 配管固定具・パーツ; 排水・配管設備; ホース・配管; 配管パイプ; 配管修理キット; ウォーターサーバー・浄水器; 水位調整器; 通水タイマー; 井戸用品
zh-CN: 五金/硬件 > 管道: 水管配件/支架; 水管装置和部件; 管道设备; 水暖软管; 水管管道; 管道修理工具包; 饮水机与净水器; 水平尺; 浇水/喷水定时器; 水井用品
lt-LT: Techninė įranga > Santechnika: Santechnikos detalės ir atramos; Santechnikos įranga ir dalys; Santechninė įranga; Vandentiekio žarnos ir tiekimo linijos; Vandentiekio vamzdžiai; Santechnikos remonto rinkiniai; Vandens dozavimas ir filtravimas; Vandens lygio palaikymo įrenginiai; Vandens laikmačiai; Šulinių reikmenys
cs: Kutilství a řemeslo > Vodoinstalace: Vodovodní armatury; Instalatérské potřeby a součástky; Instalatérské armatury; Vodovodní hadice a PE potrubí; Instalatérské trubky; Sady na opravy a údržbu potrubí; Dávkování a filtrace vody; Zařízení na vyrovnávání vodní hladiny; Časovače na spuštění vody; Vybavení studní
bg-BG: Железария > Водоснабдяване и канализация: Водопроводни фитинги и опори; Аксесоари и части за ВиК оборудване; Санитарно обзавеждане; Гъвкави връзки и водопроводни тръби; Водопроводни тръби; ВиК комплекти за ремонт; Дистрибуция и филтриране на вода; Регулатори на нивото на водата; Таймери за вода; Консумативи за кладенци
tr: Hırdavat > Sıhhi tesisat: Sıhhi Tesisat Bağlantı Parçaları; Su Tahliye Teçhizatı ve Parçaları; Sıhhi Tesisat Armatürleri; Tesisat Hortumları ve İkmal Hatları; Sıhhi Tesisat Boruları; Boru Tamir Malzemeleri; Su Dağıtım ve Arıtma Sistemleri; Su Seviyesi Tespit Cihazları; Su Zamanlayıcıları; Su Kuyusu Malzemeleri
nl: Bouwmaterialen > Loodgieterswerk: Loodgietersbenodigdheden; Onderdelen voor sanitair; Sanitair; Slangen en leidingen voor loodgieterswerk; Waterleidingen; Reparatiesets voor loodgieterswerk; Waterdispensers en -filters; Waterpasinstrumenten; Watertimer; Putbenodigdheden
vi: Phần cứng > Đường ống: Ống - khớp nối; Bộ phận và phần cứng của thiết bị đường ống; Thiết bị kỹ thuật vệ sinh; Ống nước và đường ống cấp nước; Ống nước; Bộ dụng cụ sửa chữa ống nước; Lọc và phân phối nước; Máy thủy bình; Bộ hẹn giờ bơm nước; Phụ tùng cho giếng
it: Articoli di ferramenta > Prodotti idraulici: Supporti e raccordi per tubi; Ferramenta per la riparazione di impianti idraulici; Articoli idraulici; Tubi e flessibili; Tubature idrauliche; Kit per riparazioni idrauliche; Distribuzione/filtro acqua; Livellatori acqua; Timer per acqua; Articoli per pozzi
en: Hardware > Plumbing: Plumbing Fittings & Supports; Plumbing Fixture Hardware & Parts; Plumbing Fixtures; Plumbing Hoses & Supply Lines; Plumbing Pipes; Plumbing Repair Kits; Water Dispensing & Filtration; Water Levelers; Water Timers; Well Supplies
ro-RO: Feronerie > Instalații sanitare: Fitinguri și suporturi sanitare; Accesorii de feronerie și piese pentru instalații sanitare; Corpuri sanitare; Furtunuri și conducte de alimentare pentru instalații sanitare; Conducte pentru instalații sanitare; Seturi de reparații instalații sanitare; Distribuirea și filtrarea apei; Dispozitiv pentru menținerea nivelului apei; Temporizatoare pentru apă; Articole pentru fântâni
hr-HR: Željezarija > Vodoinstalaterska oprema: Vodovodni priključci i nosači; Oprema i dijelovi za vodoinstalatersku opremu; Sanitarna keramika i slavine; Vodovodna crijeva i opskrbni vodovi; Vodovodne cijevi; Kompleti za popravak vodovodnih instalacija; Doziranje i filtriranje vode; Regulator razine vode; Vremenske sklopke za vodu; Pribor za bunare
el: Υλικά κατασκευών > Υδραυλικές εγκαταστάσεις: Εξαρτήματα & στηρίγματα υδραυλικών εγκαταστάσεων; Εξαρτήματα & ανταλλακτικά υδραυλικών ειδών; Υδραυλικά είδη; Σωλήνες & γραμμές παροχής υδραυλικών εγκαταστάσεων; Υδραυλικοί σωλήνες; Κιτ επισκευής υδραυλικών εγκαταστάσεων; Συσκευές διανομής & φιλτραρίσματος νερού; Εξισωτές στάθμης νερού; Χρονοδιακόπτες νερού; Προμήθειες για πηγάδια
pt-PT: Equipamento > Canalização: Encaixes e suportes de canalização; Peças e equipamento de fixação de canalização; Fixações de canalização; Linhas de abastecimento e mangueiras de canalização; Tubos de canalização; Kits de reparação de canalização; Distribuição e filtragem de água; Niveladores de água; Temporizadores de água; Artigos para poços
zh-TW: 硬體 > 管線: 管線接頭/支架; 衛生器具和零件; 管線設備; 水管和供水管線; 水管; 水管維修工具組; 用水配送和過濾; 水位測量器; 給水/灑水計時器; 鑿井用品
pl: Sprzęt > Systemy hydrauliczne: Mocowania hydrauliczne; Armatura wodociągowa i części; Armatury; Węże i przewody hydrauliczne; Rury hydrauliczne; Zestawy do naprawy hydrauliki; Dystrybucja i filtrowanie wody; Kontrolery poziomu wody; Sterowniki nawadniania; Akcesoria do studni
pt-BR: Ferragens > Encanamento: Juntas e conexões para encanamento; Peças e ferragens para fixação de encanamento; Instalações de encanamento; Mangueiras e linhas de suprimento; Tubos para encanamento; Kits para reparos de encanamento; Distribuição e filtragem de água; Niveladores de água; Temporizadores de água; Suprimentos para poços
fr: Quincaillerie > Plomberie: Fixations et supports de plomberie; Pièces et matériel de plomberie; Équipements sanitaires; Tuyaux de plomberie et arrivées d’eau; Tuyaux de plomberie; Trousses de plomberie; Distribution et filtration de l’eau; Régulateurs de niveau d’eau; Programmateurs d’arrosage; Accessoires pour puits
th: ฮาร์ดแวร์ > ระบบท่อประปา: ที่ติดตั้งระบบท่อ; ฮาร์ดแวร์และชิ้นส่วนสำหรับงานท่อ; ที่ติดตั้งท่อ; ท่อทางเดินน้ำและสายอุปกรณ์; ท่อน้ำ; ชุดซ่อมแซมท่อ; การจ่ายและกรองน้ำ; ที่วัดระดับน้ำ; เครื่องตั้งเวลาเปิดปิดน้ำอัตโนมัติ; อุปกรณ์บ่อ
fi: Rakentaminen > Putkityöt: Putkien osat ja kiinnikkeet; Putkien kiinnitys ja osat; Putkiston kiinnikkeet; Pehmeät putket ja syöttöjohdot; Putket; Putkikorjaussetit; Veden käyttöautomaatit ja suodatus; Vedenkorkeuden säätölaitteet; Vesiajastimet; Kaivotarvikkeet
hu: Hardver > Vízvezeték: Vízvezeték-szerelvények és -támasztékok; Vízvezeték-szerelvény-hardver és -alkatrészek; Vízvezeték-szerelvények; Vízvezeték-tömlők és ellátó vezetékek; Vízvezeték-csövek; Vízvezetékjavító készletek; Vízadagolás és szűrés; Vízszintezők; Vízidőzítők; Kútkellékek
de: Heimwerkerbedarf > Sanitär: Rohrverbindungsstücke & -halterungen; Zubehör für sanitäre Anlagen; Sanitärkeramik & Armaturen; Schläuche & Leitungen; Installationsrohre; Sanitär-Reparatursätze; Trinkwasserspender & Filter; Wasserstandsregler; Wasserschaltuhren; Brunnenbedarf
sv: Metallprodukter > Rörmokeri: Rördelar; Vattenkransutrustning och -delar; Sanitära produkter; Slangar och anslutningsslangar; VVS-rör; Reparationskit - rörmokeri; Vattenautomater och vattenfiltrering; Utjämnare för vattennivå; Vattentimers; Brunnstillbehör
ru: Оборудование и технические изделия > Системы водоснабжения и водоотведения: Фитинги и крепления для труб; Комплектующие и детали для сантехнического оборудования; Сантехника; Сантехнические шланги и гибкая подводка; Сантехнические трубы; Сантехнические наборы для ремонта; Фильтрация и подача воды; Регуляторы уровня воды; Таймеры подачи воды; Оборудование для колодцев и скважин
ko: 철물 > 배관: 배관 부속품/지지대; 배관 시설 장비/부품; 배관설비; 배관 호스/수도관; 배관 파이프; 배관 수리 키트; 급수/정수; 수위 조절기; 워터 타이머; 지하수 용품
sk-SK: Náradie > Vodoinštalačné práce: Vodovodné armatúry a podpery; Príslušenstvo a diely pre vodovodné armatúry; Vodovodné armatúry; Vodovodné hadice a prívodné vedenia; Vodovodné potrubie; Súpravy na opravu vodovodného potrubia; Dávkovanie a filtrácia vody; Výškomery vody; Vodné časovače; Príslušenstvo ku studniam
nb: Maskinvare > Rørlegging: Rørfester og -støtter; Utstyr og deler for rørmontering; Rørleggerarmaturer; Rør- og vannslanger; Rørdeler; Reparasjonssett for sanitæranlegg; Vanndispensering og -filtrering; Vannivåregulerer; Vanntimere; Brønnutstyr
es: Bricolaje > Fontanería: Accesorios de fontanería; Piezas y herramientas para componentes de fontanería; Piezas para fontanería; Conductos de abastecimiento y mangueras; Tuberías de fontanería; Kits de reparación para fontanería; Filtración y distribución de agua; Niveladores de agua; Temporizadores de riego; Abastecimientos para pozos